Illinois, session 104th, SB3367.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Chapter 7a as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/Ch. 7a heading new)7CHAPTER 7a. CONFIDENCE IN FIREARM PROTECTION LAW 8    (625 ILCS 5/7a-101 new)9    Sec. 7a-101. Findings and purpose. The General Assembly 10finds that the timely surrender of a firearm, firearm parts, a 11Firearm Owner's Identification Card, and a concealed carry 12license when the person is subject to an order of protection is 13necessary to maintain public safety but, more importantly, the 14safety of an individual, adult or minor, protected by the 15order of protection. Further, the General Assembly finds that 16the State has a compelling interest in ensuring that an 17individual prohibited from possessing firearms because the 18individual is subject to an order of protection demonstrates 19responsibility, including firearm responsibility, in order to 20safely own and operate a motor vehicle. These sanctions compel 21compliance with the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act and 22provide additional avenues to enforce compliance.  SB3367- 2 -LRB104 16579 LNS 29978 b1    To this end, the Secretary of State is authorized to 2establish systems to suspend driver's licenses for failure to 3comply with the requirements of the Firearm Owners 4Identification Card Act concerning orders of protection. The 5Secretary of State is also authorized to establish a system to 6suspend an individual's ability to register or renew a 7registration for a motor vehicle of the first division or a 8motor vehicle of the second division registered at not more 9than 8,000 pounds for failure to comply with the requirements 10of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act concerning 11orders of protection. 12    (625 ILCS 5/7a-102 new)13    Sec. 7a-102. Suspension of driving and registration 14privileges for noncompliance of the Firearm Owners 15Identification Card Act related to orders of protection.16    (a) The Secretary of State shall suspend the driver's 17license issued to an individual upon receiving an 18authenticated report provided for in subsection (a) of Section 197a-103 that the individual has failed to comply with Section 209.5 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act after 21suspension or revocation of the individual's Firearm Owner's 22Identification Card under Section 8.2 of the Firearm Owners 23Identification Card Act. Upon receipt of the report, the 24Secretary of State shall enter the suspension and 25disqualification to the individual's driving record and the   SB3367- 3 -LRB104 16579 LNS 29978 b1suspension and disqualification shall be effective on the 61st 2day following the date of notice under Section 7a-105.3    (b) The Secretary of State shall suspend the individual's 4ability to register or renew registration for a motor vehicle 5of the first division or a motor vehicle of the second division 6registered at not more than 8,000 pounds upon receiving an 7authenticated report provided for in subsection (b) of Section 87a-103 that the individual has failed to comply with Section 99.5 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act after 10suspension or revocation of the individual's Firearm Owner's 11Identification Card under Section 8.2 of the Firearm Owners 12Identification Card Act. Upon receipt of the report, the 13Secretary of State shall enter the suspension and 14disqualification to the individual's driving record and the 15suspension and disqualification shall be effective on the 61st 16day following the date of notice under Section 7a-105. 17    (625 ILCS 5/7a-103 new)18    Sec. 7a-103. Illinois State Police to report noncompliance 19of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act concerning 20orders of protection.21    (a) The Illinois State Police shall forward to the 22Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of 23State, an authenticated document certifying the requirements 24have been met to suspend the issued driver's license of the 25individual no more than 7 days after the suspension or   SB3367- 4 -LRB104 16579 LNS 29978 b1revocation of the individual's Firearm Owner's Identification 2Card under Section 8.2 of the Firearm Owners Identification 3Card Act.4    (b) The Illinois State Police shall forward to the 5Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of 6State, an authenticated document certifying the requirements 7have been met to suspend the individual's ability to register 8or renew registration for a motor vehicle of the first 9division or a motor vehicle of the second division registered 10at not more than 8,000 pounds no more than 7 days after the 11suspension or revocation of the individual's Firearm Owner's 12Identification Card under Section 8.2 of the Firearm Owners 13Identification Card Act. 14    (625 ILCS 5/7a-104 new)15    Sec. 7a-104. Suspension to continue until compliance with 16the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act concerning orders 17of protection.18    (a) The suspension of a driver's license under Section 197a-102 shall remain in effect unless and until the Secretary 20of State receives authenticated documentation that the 21individual is in compliance with the requirements of Section 229.5 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. The 23Illinois State Police shall immediately report the 24individual's compliance with the requirements of Section 9.5 25of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act to the Secretary   SB3367- 5 -LRB104 16579 LNS 29978 b1of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State. The 2Secretary of State shall immediately reinstate the driver's 3license upon receipt of this report from the Illinois State 4Police.5    (b) The suspension of an individual's ability to register 6or renew registration on a motor vehicle of the first division 7or a motor vehicle of the second division registered at not 8more than 8,000 pounds under Section 7a-102 shall remain in 9effect unless and until the Secretary of State receives 10authenticated documentation that the individual is in 11compliance with the requirements of Section 9.5 of the Firearm 12Owners Identification Card Act. The Illinois State Police 13shall immediately report the individual's compliance with the 14requirements of Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners 15Identification Card Act to the Secretary of State, on a form 16prescribed by the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State 17shall immediately reinstate the ability to register or renew 18registration on a motor vehicle of the first division or a 19motor vehicle of the second division registered at not more 20than 8,000 pounds upon receipt of this report from the 21Illinois State Police. 22    (625 ILCS 5/7a-105 new)23    Sec. 7a-105. Notice.24    (a) The Secretary of State, prior to suspending a driver's 25license under this Chapter, shall serve written notice upon an   SB3367- 6 -LRB104 16579 LNS 29978 b1individual that the individual's driver's license shall be 2suspended in 60 days from the date on the notice unless the 3individual meets the requirements of Section 9.5 of the 4Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. This notice shall be 5sent no more than 7 days after receipt of the report under 6subsection (a) of Section 7a-103.7    (b) The Secretary of State, prior to suspending an 8individual's ability to register or renew registration of a 9motor vehicle of the first division or a motor vehicle of the 10second division registered at not more than 8,000 pounds under 11this Chapter, shall serve written notice upon an individual 12that the individual's ability to register or renew 13registration on a motor vehicle of the first division or a 14motor vehicle of the second division registered at not more 15than 8,000 pounds shall be suspended in 60 days from the date 16on the notice unless the individual meets the requirements of 17Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. 18This notice shall be sent no more than 7 days after receipt of 19the report under subsection (b) of Section 7a-103. 20    (625 ILCS 5/7a-106 new)21    Sec. 7a-106. Administrative hearing.22    (a) A driver may contest this driver's license sanction by 23requesting an administrative hearing in accordance with rules 24adopted by the Secretary of State. If a written request for 25this hearing is received prior to the effective date of the   SB3367- 7 -LRB104 16579 LNS 29978 b1suspension, the suspension shall be stayed. If a stay of the 2suspension is granted, it shall remain in effect until a 3hearing decision is entered. At the conclusion of this 4hearing, the Secretary of State may rescind or impose the 5driver's license suspension. If the suspension is upheld, it 6shall become effective 10 days from the date the hearing 7decision is entered. If the decision is to rescind the 8suspension, no suspension of driving privileges shall be 9entered. The scope of this hearing shall be limited to the 10following issues:11        (1) Whether the driver is the person who is subject to 12    an order of protection and failed to meet the requirements 13    of Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card 14    Act.15        (2) Whether the authenticated document by the Illinois 16    State Police indicates that the driver is subject to an 17    order of protection and failed to meet the requirements of 18    Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.19        (3) Whether the order of protection has expired.20    (b) A driver may contest this motor vehicle registration 21sanction by requesting an administrative hearing in accordance 22with rules adopted by the Secretary of State. If a written 23request for this hearing is received prior to the effective 24date of the suspension, the suspension shall be stayed. If a 25stay of the suspension is granted, it shall remain in effect 26until a hearing decision is entered. At the conclusion of this   SB3367- 8 -LRB104 16579 LNS 29978 b1hearing, the Secretary of State may rescind or impose the 2individual's motor vehicle registration suspension. If the 3suspension is upheld, it shall become effective 10 days from 4the date the hearing decision is entered. If the decision is to 5rescind the suspension, no suspension of privileges to 6register or renew registration for a motor vehicle of the 7first division or a motor vehicle of the second division 8registered at not more than 8,000 pounds shall be entered. The 9scope of this hearing shall be limited to the following 10issues:11        (1) Whether the individual is the person who is 12    subject to an order of protection and failed to meet the 13    requirements of Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners 14    Identification Card Act.15        (2) Whether the authenticated document by the Illinois 16    State Police indicates that the individual is subject to 17    an order of protection and failed to meet the requirements 18    of Section 9.5 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card 19    Act.20        (3) Whether the order of protection has expired. 21    (625 ILCS 5/7a-107 new)22    Sec. 7a-107. Rules and data sharing.23    (a) The Secretary of State, using the authority to license 24motor vehicle operators, may adopt such rules as may be 25necessary to establish standards, policies, and procedures   SB3367- 9 -LRB104 16579 LNS 29978 b1related to this Chapter.2    (b) The Illinois State Police, under its statutory 3authority, may adopt such rules as may be necessary to 4establish standards, policies, and procedures related to this 5Chapter.6    (c) The Illinois State Police and Secretary of State shall 7create a mechanism by which data concerning this Chapter may 8be electronically shared, including entering into interagency 9agreements.  SB3367- 10 -LRB104 16579 LNS 29978 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    625 ILCS 5/Ch. 7a heading 4    new5    625 ILCS 5/7a-101 new6    625 ILCS 5/7a-102 new7    625 ILCS 5/7a-103 new8    625 ILCS 5/7a-104 new9    625 ILCS 5/7a-105 new10    625 ILCS 5/7a-106 new11    625 ILCS 5/7a-107 new